nl: Hockey maatsegment: Volwassenen; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Jeugd; Overig
sk-SK: Segment hokejových veľkostí: Dospelí; Stredná (Intermediate); Juniorská; Pro Stock; Seniorská; Detská; Iné
ro-RO: Segmentul dimensional al hocheiului: Adulți; Intermediari; Juniori; Pro Stock; Seniori; Tineret; Altele
it: Segmento di taglia per hockey: Adulti; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Youth; Altro
zh-TW: 曲棍球尺寸分群: 成人用; 中級; 青少年用; 職業級; 成人用; 兒童用; 其他
sv: Hockeystorlekssegment: Vuxen; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Ungdom; Annat
sl-SI: Segment velikosti za hokej: Odrasli; Srednja; Mladinska; Pro Stock; Članska; Otroška; Drugo
cs: Velikost hokeje Segmenty: Pro dospělé; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Dětský (Youth); Jiný
pl: Segment rozmiaru hokejowego: Dorośli; Pośredni; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Dziecięcy; Inny
vi: Phân khúc kích thước khúc côn cầu: Người lớn; Trung cấp; Thanh thiếu niên; Chuyên nghiệp; Người lớn; Trẻ em; Khác
bg-BG: Размерен сегмент за хокей: Възрастни; Междинен; За юноши; За професионалисти; За възрастни; За деца; Други
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους εξοπλισμού χόκεϊ: Ενηλίκων; Ενδιάμεσο; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Παιδικό; Άλλο
ru: Размерный сегмент хоккейной экипировки: Взрослый; Подростковый; Юниорский; Профессиональный; Взрослый (Senior); Детский; Другое
es: Segmento de tamaño de hockey: Adulto; Intermedio; Júnior; Pro Stock; Sénior; Infantil; Otro
tr: Hokey ekipman beden kategorisi: Yetişkin; Orta; Genç; Pro Stock; Büyük; Çocuk; Diğer
pt-BR: Segmento de tamanho para hóquei: Adulto; Intermediário; Júnior; Pro Stock; Sênior; Jovem; Outros
hu: Jégkorong méretszegmens: Felnőtt; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Gyerek; Egyéb
th: ขนาดอุปกรณ์ฮอกกี้: ผู้ใหญ่; ระดับกลาง; จูเนียร์; โปรสต็อก; ซีเนียร์; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
ko: 하키 사이즈 세그먼트: 성인용; 인터미디어트; 주니어; 프로 스톡; 시니어; 유스; 기타
de: Hockey-Größensegment: Erwachsene; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Jugend; Andere
nb: Hockey størrelsesgruppe: Voksen; Intermediate; Junior; Pro stock; Senior; Youth; Annet
ja: ホッケーのサイズセグメント: 大人; インターミディエイト; ジュニア; プロストック; シニア; ユース; その他
hr-HR: Segment veličine hokeja: Za odrasle; Srednji; Juniorski; Pro Stock; Seniorski; Za djecu; Ostalo
da: Størrelsessegment for hockeyudstyr: Voksen; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Youth; Andet
pt-PT: Hóquei 4 Segmentos: Adulto; Intermédio; Júnior; Pro Stock; Sénior; Jovem; Outro
fr: Catégorie de taille pour le hockey: Adulte; Intermédiaire; Junior; Pro Stock; Sénior; Jeunesse; Autre
zh-CN: 冰球适用尺寸段: 成人; 中级; 少年; 职业球员版; 成人; 儿童; 其他
lt-LT: Ledo ritulio dydžio segmentas: Suaugusiųjų; Paauglių (Intermediate); Jaunių; Profesionalų („Pro Stock“); Suaugusiųjų; Vaikų; Kita
fi: Jääkiekkovarusteiden kokoluokka: Aikuinen; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Youth; Muu
en: Hockey size segment: Adult; Intermediate; Junior; Pro Stock; Senior; Youth; Other